District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-251

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-243, § 3, 42 DCR 91
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-62, § 2(a), 44 DCR 7486
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 30, 47 DCR 1325
1981 Ed., § 5-121.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-208, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2403).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Housing Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-272, April 27, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4278).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Housing Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-92, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2843).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-357, August 8, 1996, 43 DCR 4628), § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-417, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6080), and § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-470, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 184).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-67, April 18, 1997, 44 DCR 2617).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Housing Authority Police Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-217, November 21, 1997, 44 DCR 7622).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Housing Authority Police Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-289, February 27, 1998, 45 DCR 1743).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Housing Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-569, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 887).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Housing Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-200, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10448).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-274, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2008).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).

D.C. Law 10-243, § 2 ( 42 DCR 91), eff. March 21, 1995, provided:

“Sec. 2. Purpose.

“(a) The Council of the District of Columbia hereby finds: (1) That the quality of life for those citizens who require housing assistance is inextricably linked to safe and affordable housing; (2) That quality public housing sustains and creates opportunities for self-sufficiency, and social and economic improvement; (3) That the inability of some residents to provide shelter for themselves and their families compels them to live in unsafe and unhealthy conditions; and (4) That these conditions are detrimental to the health and welfare of District residents and adversely affect the economy of the District.

“(b) The Council determines that it is necessary and in the public interest to create an independent housing authority in the District of Columbia and to confer and vest in the authority all powers necessary or appropriate in order that it may engage in providing and maintaining quality public housing in the District of Columbia.”